Maine, session 132, LD2.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §101, sub-§20-A is enacted to read:
20-A. Demilitarized vehicle. "Demilitarized vehicle" means an automobile that was
built for and used by the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force
or Coast Guard and has been lawfully purchased by a person for civilian use.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §458-C is enacted to read:
§458-C. Demilitarized vehicles
A demilitarized vehicle may be registered in accordance with the provisions of this
section.
1. Registration fee. The fee for the demilitarized vehicle registration plate is the motor
vehicle registration fee required by section 501, subsection 1 and the excise tax required
by Title 36, section 1482.
2. Registration plates. The Secretary of State shall issue a registration certificate and
a set of demilitarized vehicle registration plates in a 3-number and 3-letter combination
sequence to be displayed on the demilitarized vehicle in lieu of regular registration plates.
3. Application. An application for registration of a demilitarized vehicle under this
section must be accompanied by evidence of the transfer of title from the Federal
Government to the registrant and an affidavit that the demilitarized vehicle is garaged or
maintained in the State.
4. Registration. The registration must indicate that the vehicle is a demilitarized
vehicle.
5. Vanity plates. The Secretary of State may issue vanity plates for demilitarized
vehicles in accordance with section 453 and may not duplicate vanity plates issued in
another class of plate.
6. Weight limit. A demilitarized vehicle registration plate may be issued only for an
automobile that does not exceed 10,000 pounds.
7. Inspection. A demilitarized vehicle is subject to the inspection requirements of
section 1751, except that the Chief of the State Police may provide certain exemptions
pursuant to section 1769.